Utah statutes.
23-27-301.   Division's power to prevent invasive species infestation.
To eradicate and prevent the infestation of a Dreissena mussel, the division
may:
(1)  temporarily stop, detain, and inspect a conveyance or equipment that:
(a)  the division reasonably believes is in violation of Section 23-27-201; or
(b)  is stopped at a port-of-entry;
(2)  require a motor vehicle transporting a conveyance or equipment to stop
for an inspection at a port-of-entry if the Department of Transportation
authorizes the division to use the port-of-entry;
(3)  conduct an administrative checkpoint in accordance with Section
77-23-104;
(4)  detain and quarantine a conveyance or equipment as provided in Section
23-27-302;
(5)  order a person to decontaminate a conveyance or equipment; and
(6)  inspect the following that may contain a Dreissena mussel:
(a)  a water body;
(b)  a facility; and
(c)  a water supply system.
